Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 16.1 Idling

31-16.1-1.
Purpose.

The purposes of this chapter are to protect health and the environment by reducing air emissions and to conserve fuel by restricting the unnecessary operation of diesel engines.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 557, § 2.

31-16.1-2.
Powers of the department of environmental management.

The department of environmental management shall have the power and authority as set forth in §§

23-23-29.1

—

23-23-29.5

to establish rules for engine idling.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 557, § 2.

31-16.1-3.
Restrictions on idling for diesel engines.

No person shall on or after July 1, 2007, cause, allow or permit the unnecessary operation of the diesel engine vehicle while said vehicle is stopped for a period of time in excess of five (5) consecutive minutes in any sixty (60) minute period unless exempted pursuant to regulations adopted by the department of environmental management. Failure to operate the diesel engine vehicle in conformity with the rules of the department of environmental management adopted pursuant to § 23-23-20.2 shall constitute a violation of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 557, § 2.

31-16.1-4.
Penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense, nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each succeeding offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 557, § 2.